epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/grc.xml
		.κυνο2ϲ1β
		.κυνό2σ1ο
		.κυνό2σ1ο
		.κυνό2ϲ1ο
		.κυνό2ϲ1ο
		.κυνο2σ1ο
		.κυνο2ϲ1ο
		.κυνο2σ1φ
		.κυνο2ϲ1φ
		.μελα2ν1άγ
		.μελα2ν1άγ
		.μελα2ν1αγ
		.μελα2ν1άε
		.μελα2ν1άε
		.μελα2ν1αέ
		.μελα2ν1αέ
		.μελα2ν1αθ
		.μελα2ν1αιγ
		.μελα2ν1αυγ
		.μελα2ν1είμ
		.μελα2ν1είμ
		.μελα2ν1εῖμ
		.μελά2ν1ιππ
		.μελά2ν1ιππ
		.μελα2ν1ίππ
		.μελα2ν1ίππ
		.μελα2ν1όμμ
		.μελα2ν1όμμ
		.μελα2ν1ομμ
		.μελά2ν1οσσ
		.μελά2ν1οσσ
		.μελά2ν1οϲϲ
		.μελά2ν1οϲϲ
		.μελα2ν1όσσ
		.μελα2ν1όσσ
		.μελα2ν1όϲϲ
		.μελα2ν1όϲϲ
		.μελά2ν1οστ
		.μελά2ν1οστ
		.μελά2ν1οϲτ
		.μελά2ν1οϲτ
		.μελα2ν1όστ
		.μελα2ν1όστ
		.μελα2ν1όϲτ
		.μελα2ν1όϲτ
		.μελά2ν1ουρ
		.μελά2ν1ουρ
		.μελα2ν1ούρ
		.μελα2ν1ούρ
		.μελα2ν1ουρ
		.μελά2ν1υ
		.μελά2ν1υ
		.μελα2ν1ύ
		.μελα2ν1ύ
		.μετε2ξ1α
		.μετε2ξ1έ
		.μετε2ξ1έ
		.μετε2ξ1ε
		.μογι2σ1
		.μογι2ϲ1
		.μογο2σ1τ
		.μογο2ϲ1τ
		.μυ2σ1π
		.μυ2ϲ1π
		.μυ2σ1επ
		.μυ2ϲ1επ
		.νεώ2σ1οικ
		.νεώ2σ1οικ
		.νεώ2ϲ1οικ
		.νεώ2ϲ1οικ
		.νεω2σ1οίκ
		.νεω2σ1οίκ
		.νεω2ϲ1οίκ
		.νεω2ϲ1οίκ
		.νου2ν1ε
		.ξυ2ν1αγ
		.ξυ2ν1ε
		.ξυ2ν1έ
		.ξυ2ν1έ
		.ξύ2ν1ε
		.ξύ2ν1ε
		.ξυ3ν2εώ
		.ξυ3ν2εώ
		.ξυ3ν2εῶ
		.ξυ2ν1ῆκ
		.ξύ2ν1ι
		.ξύ2ν1ι
		.ξυ2ν1ί
		.ξυ2ν1ί
		οἱο2ν1εί.
		οἱο2ν1εί.
		οἱο2ν1εὶ.
		οἱό2σ1
		οἱό2σ1
		οἱό2ϲ1
		οἱό2ϲ1
		οἰ2σ1πώτ
		οἰ2σ1πώτ
		οἰ2ϲ1πώτ
		οἰ2ϲ1πώτ
		οἰ2σ1πωτ
		οἰ2ϲ1πωτ
		ὁλο2ν1έν.
		ὁλο2ν1έν.
		ὁλο2ν1ὲν.
		ὁπω2σ1
		ὁπω2ϲ1
		ὅ2σ1γε.
		ὅ2ϲ1γε.
		ὁσο2ν1ῶν.
		ὁϲο2ν1ῶν.
		ὅ2σ1περ.
		ὅ2ϲ1περ.
		ὅ2σ1τις
		ὅ2ϲ1τιϲ
		οἷ2σ1τισι
		οἷ2ϲ1τιϲι
		οὕ2σ1τινας
		οὕ2ϲ1τιναϲ
		ἧ2σ1τινος
		ἧ2ϲ1τινοϲ
		αἷ2σ1τισι
		αἷ2ϲ1τιϲι
		ἅ2σ1τινας
		ἅ2ϲ1τιναϲ
		ὁ2σ1τι2σ1οῦν.
		ὁ2ϲ1τι2ϲ1οῦν.
		ἡτι2σ1οῦν.
		ἡτι2ϲ1οῦν.
		ὁποιου2σ1τινα2σ1οῦν.
		ὁποιου2ϲ1τινα2ϲ1οῦν.
		οὐδενό2σ1ω
		οὐδενό2σ1ω
		οὐδενό2ϲ1ω
		οὐδενό2ϲ1ω
		οὐδενο2σ1ώ
		οὐδενο2σ1ώ
		οὐδενο2ϲ1ώ
		οὐδενο2ϲ1ώ
		.παλι2ν1
		.παλί2ν1
		.παλί2ν1
		.πα2ν1
		.πά2ν1
		.πά2ν1
		.πα3ν2ός.
		.πα3ν2ός.
		.πα3ν2όϲ.
		.πα3ν2όϲ.
		.πα3ν2ὸς.
		.πα3ν2ὸϲ.
		.πα3ν2όσ.
		.πα3ν2όσ.
		.πα3ν2ὸσ.
		.πα3ν2ί.
		.πα3ν2ί.
		.πα3ν2ὶ.
		.πάνα.
		.πάνα.
		.πα3ν2ῶν.
		.πα3ν2ικ
		.πα3ν2ίσδ
		.πα3ν2ίσδ
		.πα3ν2ίϲδ
		.πα3ν2ίϲδ
		.πα3ν2ισδ
		.πα3ν2ιϲδ
		.πα3ν2οῦ.
		.πα3ν2ῷ.
		.πα3ν2ό.
		.πα3ν2ό.
		.πα3ν2ὸ.
		.πα3ν2όν.
		.πα3ν2όν.
		.πα3ν2ὸν.
		.πα3ν2έ.
		.πα3ν2έ.
		.πα3ν2ὲ.
		.πα3ν2οί.
		.πα3ν2οί.
		.πα3ν2οὶ.
		.πα3ν2οῖς.
		.πα3ν2οῖϲ.
		.πα3ν2οῖσ.
		.πα3ν2ούς.
		.πα3ν2ούς.
		.πα3ν2ούϲ.
		.πα3ν2ούϲ.
		.πα3ν2οὺς.
		.πα3ν2οὺϲ.
		.πα3ν2ούσ.
		.πα3ν2ούσ.
		.πα3ν2οὺσ.
		.παρα2ν1ίσχ
		.παρα2ν1ίσχ
		.παρα2ν1ίϲχ
		.παρα2ν1ίϲχ
		.παρεί2σ1
		.παρεί2σ1
		.παρεί2ϲ1
		.παρεί2ϲ1
		.παρει2σ1
		.παρει2ϲ1
		.παρε2κ1λ
		.παρε2κ1τρ
		.παρε2ν1εῖ
		.παρε2ν1ο
		.παρε2ξ1
		.παρέ2ξ1
		.παρέ2ξ1
		παρέ3ξ2ω.
		παρέ3ξ2ω.
		παρέ3ξ2εις.
		παρέ3ξ2εις.
		παρέ3ξ2ειϲ.
		παρέ3ξ2ειϲ.
		παρέ3ξ2εισ.
		παρέ3ξ2εισ.
		παρέ3ξ2ει.
		παρέ3ξ2ει.
		παρέ3ξ2ετον.
		παρέ3ξ2ετον.
		παρε3ξ2έτην.
		παρε3ξ2έτην.
		παρέ3ξ2ομεν.
		παρέ3ξ2ομεν.
		παρέ3ξ2ετε.
		παρέ3ξ2ετε.
		παρέ3ξ2ουσι.
		παρέ3ξ2ουσι.
		παρέ3ξ2ουϲι.
		παρέ3ξ2ουϲι.
		παρέ3ξ2ομαι
		παρέ3ξ2ομαι
		παρέ3ξ2ῃ
		παρέ3ξ2ῃ
		παρέ3ξ2εται.
		παρέ3ξ2εται.
		παρέ3ξ2εσθον.
		παρέ3ξ2εσθον.
		παρέ3ξ2εϲθον.
		παρέ3ξ2εϲθον.
		παρε3ξ2όμεθα.
		παρε3ξ2όμεθα.
		παρέ3ξ2εσθε.
		παρέ3ξ2εσθε.
		παρέ3ξ2εϲθε.
		παρέ3ξ2εϲθε.
		παρέ3ξ2ονται.
		παρέ3ξ2ονται.
		.πλεο2ν1έ
		.πλεο2ν1έ
		.πλεο2ν1ε
		.προει2σ1
		.προει2ϲ1
		.προε2κ1
		.προε2ν1
		.προε2ξ1
		.προέ2ξ1
		.προέ2ξ1
		.προ2σ1
		.προ2ϲ1
		.προ3σ2άβ
		.προ3σ2άβ
		.προ3ϲ2άβ
		.προ3ϲ2άβ
		.προ3σ2αβ
		.προ3ϲ2αβ
		.προσει2σ1
		.προϲει2ϲ1
		.προ3σ2εί
		.προ3σ2εί
		.προ3ϲ2εί
		.προ3ϲ2εί
		.προ3σ2έσει
		.προ3σ2έσει
		.προ3ϲ2έϲει
		.προ3ϲ2έϲει
		.προ3σ2εσεί
		.προ3σ2εσεί
		.προ3ϲ2εϲεί
		.προ3ϲ2εϲεί
		.προσε2ν1
		.προϲε2ν1
		.προσε2ξ1
		.προϲε2ξ1
		.πρό3σ2θι
		.πρό3σ2θι
		.πρό3ϲ2θι
		.πρό3ϲ2θι
		.προ3σ2θί
		.προ3σ2θί
		.προ3ϲ2θί
		.προ3ϲ2θί
		.προ4σ3θιγ
		.προ4ϲ3θιγ
		.πρό3σ2κοπ
		.πρό3σ2κοπ
		.πρό3ϲ2κοπ
		.πρό3ϲ2κοπ
		.προ3σ2κόπ
		.προ3σ2κόπ
		.προ3ϲ2κόπ
		.προ3ϲ2κόπ
		.προ3σ2τασ
		.προ3ϲ2ταϲ
		.προ3σ2τάτ
		.προ3σ2τάτ
		.προ3ϲ2τάτ
		.προ3ϲ2τάτ
		.προ3σ2τατ
		.προ3ϲ2τατ
		.προ3σ2ταυ
		.προ3ϲ2ταυ
		.προ3σ2τεί
		.προ3σ2τεί
		.προ3ϲ2τεί
		.προ3ϲ2τεί
		.προ3σ2τεν
		.προ3ϲ2τεν
		.προ3σ2τέν
		.προ3σ2τέν
		.προ3ϲ2τέν
		.προ3ϲ2τέν
		.προ3σ2τερν
		.προ3ϲ2τερν
		.πρό3σ2τερν
		.πρό3σ2τερν
		.πρό3ϲ2τερν
		.πρό3ϲ2τερν
		.προ3σ2τέρν
		.προ3σ2τέρν
		.προ3ϲ2τέρν
		.προ3ϲ2τέρν
		.προ3σ2τήσ
		.προ3σ2τήσ
		.προ3ϲ2τήϲ
		.προ3ϲ2τήϲ
		.προ3σ2τόμ
		.προ3σ2τόμ
		.προ3ϲ2τόμ
		.προ3ϲ2τόμ
		.προ3σ2τομ
		.προ3ϲ2τομ
		.πρό3σ2τῳ
		.πρό3σ2τῳ
		.πρό3ϲ2τῳ
		.πρό3ϲ2τῳ
		.προ3σ2τῴ
		.προ3ϲ2τῴ
		.προ3σ2υγ
		.προ3ϲ2υγ
		.προ3σ2υμ
		.προ3ϲ2υμ
		.προ3σ2υ2ν1
		.προ3ϲ2υ2ν1
		.πρό3σ2φαγμ
		.πρό3σ2φαγμ
		.πρό3ϲ2φαγμ
		.πρό3ϲ2φαγμ
		.προ3σ2φάγμ
		.προ3σ2φάγμ
		.προ3ϲ2φάγμ
		.προ3ϲ2φάγμ
		.προ3σ2φάζ
		.προ3σ2φάζ
		.προ3ϲ2φάζ
		.προ3ϲ2φάζ
		.προ3σ2φάττ
		.προ3σ2φάττ
		.προ3ϲ2φάττ
		.προ3ϲ2φάττ
		.πρό3σ2χημ
		.πρό3σ2χημ
		.πρό3ϲ2χημ
		.πρό3ϲ2χημ
		.προ3σ2χήμ
		.προ3σ2χήμ
		.προ3ϲ2χήμ
		.προ3ϲ2χήμ
		.πρό3σ2ω.
		.πρό3σ2ω.
		.πρό3ϲ2ω.
		.πρό3ϲ2ω.
		.πρό3σ2ωθεν.
		.πρό3σ2ωθεν.
		.πρό3ϲ2ωθεν.
		.πρό3ϲ2ωθεν.
		.προ3σ2ώτ
		.προ3σ2ώτ
		.προ3ϲ2ώτ
		.προ3ϲ2ώτ
		.προ3σ2ωτ
		.προ3ϲ2ωτ
		.προϋπε2ξ1
		.πυ2ρ1άγ
		.πυ2ρ1άγ
		.πυ2ρ1αγ
		.πυ2ρ1αίθ
		.πυ2ρ1αίθ
		.πυ2ρ1αιθ
		.πυ2ρ1ῆθ
		.πυ2ρ1ηθ
		.πυ2ρ1ήθ
		.πυ2ρ1ήθ
		.πυ2ρ1ακ
		.πύ2ρ1αυ
		.πύ2ρ1αυ
		.πυ2ρ1αύ
		.πυ2ρ1αύ
		.πυ2ρ1αυ
		.πυ2ρ1ήνεμ
		.πυ2ρ1ήνεμ
		.πυ2ρ1ηνέμ
		.πυ2ρ1ηνέμ
		.πυ2ρ1ωπ
		.σελα2σ1φό
		.σελα2σ1φό
		.ϲελα2ϲ1φό
		.ϲελα2ϲ1φό
		.σελα2σ1φο
		.ϲελα2ϲ1φο
		.συμπαρει2σ1
		.ϲυμπαρει2ϲ1
		.συ2ν1
		.ϲυ2ν1
		.σύ2ν1
		.σύ2ν1
		.ϲύ2ν1
		.ϲύ2ν1
		.συνδιέ2ξ1
		.συνδιέ2ξ1
		.ϲυνδιέ2ξ1
		.ϲυνδιέ2ξ1
		.συνδιε2ξ1
		.ϲυνδιε2ξ1
		.συνδυ2σ1
		.ϲυνδυ2ϲ1
		.συνε2ξ1
		.ϲυνε2ξ1
		.τεσσαρε2σ1κ
		.τεϲϲαρε2ϲ1κ
		.τρει2σ1κ
		.τρει2ϲ1κ
		.τρι2σ1
		.τρι2ϲ1
		.τρι3σ2μό
		.τρι3σ2μό
		.τρι3ϲ2μό
		.τρι3ϲ2μό
		.τρι3σ2μο
		.τρι3ϲ2μο
		.τρι3σ2μῶ
		.τρι3ϲ2μῶ
		.τρι3σ2π
		.τρι3ϲ2π
		.τρί3σ2τ
		.τρί3σ2τ
		.τρί3ϲ2τ
		.τρί3ϲ2τ
		.τρι3σ2τ
		.τρι3ϲ2τ
		.τρι3σ2ώ
		.τρι3σ2ώ
		.τρι3ϲ2ώ
		.τρι3ϲ2ώ
		.τρι3σ2ω
		.τρι3ϲ2ω
		ὑο2σ1κ
		ὑο2ϲ1κ
		ὑπεί2σ1
		ὑπεί2σ1
		ὑπεί2ϲ1
		ὑπεί2ϲ1
		ὑπει2σ1
		ὑπει2ϲ1
		ὑπεί3σ2ας
		ὑπεί3σ2ας
		ὑπεί3ϲ2αϲ
		ὑπεί3ϲ2αϲ
		ὑπεί3σ2ασ
		ὑπεί3σ2ασ
		ὑπεί3σ2αν
		ὑπεί3σ2αν
		ὑπεί3ϲ2αν
		ὑπεί3ϲ2αν
		ὑπει3σ2άν
		ὑπει3σ2άν
		ὑπει3ϲ2άν
		ὑπει3ϲ2άν
		ὑπει3σ2άσ
		ὑπει3σ2άσ
		ὑπει3ϲ2άϲ
		ὑπει3ϲ2άϲ
		ὑπε2κ1λαμ
		ὑπε2κ1λήψ
		ὑπε2κ1λήψ
		ὑπε2κ1τ
		ὑπε2ν1
		ὑπε2ξ1
		ὑπε2ρ1
		ὑπέ2ρ1
		ὑπέ2ρ1
		ὑπέ3ρ2α.
		ὑπέ3ρ2α.
		ὑπέ3ρ2ης.
		ὑπέ3ρ2ης.
		ὑπέ3ρ2ηϲ.
		ὑπέ3ρ2ηϲ.
		ὑπέ3ρ2ησ.
		ὑπέ3ρ2ησ.
		ὑπέ3ρ2ᾳ.
		ὑπέ3ρ2ᾳ.
		ὑπέ3ρ2αν.
		ὑπέ3ρ2αν.
		ὑπέ3ρ2αι.
		ὑπέ3ρ2αι.
		ὑπε3ρ2ῶν.
		ὑπέ3ρ2αις.
		ὑπέ3ρ2αις.
		ὑπέ3ρ2αιϲ.
		ὑπέ3ρ2αιϲ.
		ὑπέ3ρ2αισ.
		ὑπέ3ρ2αισ.
		ὑπέ3ρ2ας.
		ὑπέ3ρ2ας.
		ὑπέ3ρ2αϲ.
		ὑπέ3ρ2αϲ.
		ὑπέ3ρ2ασ.
		ὑπέ3ρ2ασ.
		ὑπε3ρ2εθ
		ὑπε3ρ2έθ
		ὑπε3ρ2έθ
		ὑπε3ρ2εί
		ὑπε3ρ2εί
		ὑπέ3ρ2υθ
		ὑπέ3ρ2υθ
		ὑπε3ρ2ύθ
		ὑπε3ρ2ύθ
		ὑπε3ρ2υθ
		ὑπερε2κ1τε
		ὑπερε2κ1τί
		ὑπερε2κ1τί
		ὑπε3ρ2έπτ
		ὑπε3ρ2έπτ
		ὑπε3ρ2επτ
		ὑπε3ρ2έψ
		ὑπε3ρ2έψ
		ὑπε3ρ2εψ
		ὑπε3ρ2έω
		ὑπε3ρ2έω
		ὑπε3ρ2ῶ
		ὑπε3ρ2έε
		ὑπε3ρ2έε
		ὑπε3ρ2εῖς.
		ὑπε3ρ2εῖϲ.
		ὑπε3ρ2εῖσ.
		ὑπε3ρ2εῖ.
		ὑπε3ρ2έο
		ὑπε3ρ2έο
		ὑπε3ρ2οῦ
		ὑπε3ρ2εῖτ
		ὑπε3ρ2ώ
		ὑπε3ρ2ώ
		ὑπε3ρ2ω
		ὕ2σ1τρ
		ὕ2ϲ1τρ
		ὑ2σ1τρ
		ὑ2ϲ1τρ
		.φαε2σ1φ
		.φαε2ϲ1φ
		.φω2σ1φ
		.φω2ϲ1φ
		.χαρι2σ1ανδρ
		.χαρι2ϲ1ανδρ
		.χαρι2σ1άνδρ
		.χαρι2σ1άνδρ
		.χαρι2ϲ1άνδρ
		.χαρι2ϲ1άνδρ
		.χει2ρ1άγ
		.χει2ρ1άγ
		.χει2ρ1αγ
		.χει2ρ1απ
		.χει2ρ1αψ
		.χει2ρ1ου
		.χει2ρ1ῶν
		.χει2ρ1άν
		.χει2ρ1άν
		.χει2ρ1αν
		.χη2ν1ναλ
		ὡ2σ1α2ν1εί.
		ὡ2σ1α2ν1εί.
		ὡ2ϲ1α2ν1εί.
		ὡ2ϲ1α2ν1εί.
		ὡ2σ1α2ν1εὶ.
		ὡ2ϲ1α2ν1εὶ.
		ὡ2σ1αύτως.
		ὡ2σ1αύτως.
		ὡ2ϲ1αύτωϲ.
		ὡ2ϲ1αύτωϲ.
		ὡ2σ1αύτωσ.
		ὡ2σ1αύτωσ.
		ὡ2σ1εί.
		ὡ2σ1εί.
		ὡ2ϲ1εί.
		ὡ2ϲ1εί.
		ὡ2σ1εὶ.
		ὡ2ϲ1εὶ.
		ὥ2σ1περ.
		ὥ2ϲ1περ.
		ὡ2σ1πε2ρ1εί.
		ὡ2σ1πε2ρ1εί.
		ὡ2ϲ1πε2ρ1εί.
		ὡ2ϲ1πε2ρ1εί.
		ὡ2σ1πε2ρ1εὶ.
		ὡ2ϲ1πε2ρ1εὶ.
		ὥ2σ1τε
		ὥ2ϲ1τε
		ι2σ1χίλιοι.
		ι2σ1χίλιοι.
		ι2ϲ1χίλιοι.
		ι2ϲ1χίλιοι.
		ι2σ1χιλίων.
		ι2σ1χιλίων.
		ι2ϲ1χιλίων.
		ι2ϲ1χιλίων.
		ι2σ1χιλίοις.
		ι2σ1χιλίοις.
		ι2ϲ1χιλίοιϲ.
		ι2ϲ1χιλίοιϲ.
		ι2σ1χιλίοισ.
		ι2σ1χιλίοισ.
		ι2σ1χιλίους.
		ι2σ1χιλίους.
		ι2ϲ1χιλίουϲ.
		ι2ϲ1χιλίουϲ.
		ι2σ1χιλίουσ.
		ι2σ1χιλίουσ.
		ι2σ1χίλιαι.
		ι2σ1χίλιαι.
		ι2ϲ1χίλιαι.
		ι2ϲ1χίλιαι.
		ι2σ1χιλίαις.
		ι2σ1χιλίαις.
		ι2ϲ1χιλίαιϲ.
		ι2ϲ1χιλίαιϲ.
		ι2σ1χιλίαισ.
		ι2σ1χιλίαισ.
		ι2σ1χιλίας.
		ι2σ1χιλίας.
		ι2ϲ1χιλίαϲ.
		ι2ϲ1χιλίαϲ.
		ι2σ1χιλίασ.
		ι2σ1χιλίασ.
		ι2σ1χίλια.
		ι2σ1χίλια.
		ι2ϲ1χίλια.
		ι2ϲ1χίλια.
		ι2σ1μύριοι.
		ι2σ1μύριοι.
		ι2ϲ1μύριοι.
		ι2ϲ1μύριοι.
		ι2σ1μυρίων.
		ι2σ1μυρίων.
		ι2ϲ1μυρίων.
		ι2ϲ1μυρίων.
		ι2σ1μυρίοις.
		ι2σ1μυρίοις.
		ι2ϲ1μυρίοιϲ.
		ι2ϲ1μυρίοιϲ.
		ι2σ1μυρίοισ.
		ι2σ1μυρίοισ.
		ι2σ1μυρίους.
		ι2σ1μυρίους.
		ι2ϲ1μυρίουϲ.
		ι2ϲ1μυρίουϲ.
		ι2σ1μυρίουσ.
		ι2σ1μυρίουσ.
		ι2σ1μύριαι.
		ι2σ1μύριαι.
		ι2ϲ1μύριαι.
		ι2ϲ1μύριαι.
		ι2σ1μυρίαις.
		ι2σ1μυρίαις.
		ι2ϲ1μυρίαιϲ.
		ι2ϲ1μυρίαιϲ.
		ι2σ1μυρίαισ.
		ι2σ1μυρίαισ.
		ι2σ1μυρίας.
		ι2σ1μυρίας.
		ι2ϲ1μυρίαϲ.
		ι2ϲ1μυρίαϲ.
		ι2σ1μυρίασ.
		ι2σ1μυρίασ.
		ι2σ1μύρια.
		ι2σ1μύρια.
		ι2ϲ1μύρια.
		ι2ϲ1μύρια.
		ι2σ1χιλιοστ
		ι2ϲ1χιλιοϲτ
		ι2σ1μυριοστ
		ι2ϲ1μυριοϲτ
		ι2σ1χιλιάκις.
		ι2σ1χιλιάκις.
		ι2ϲ1χιλιάκιϲ.
		ι2ϲ1χιλιάκιϲ.
		ι2σ1χιλιάκισ.
		ι2σ1χιλιάκισ.
		ι2σ1μυριάκις.
		ι2σ1μυριάκις.
		ι2ϲ1μυριάκιϲ.
		ι2ϲ1μυριάκιϲ.
		ι2σ1μυριάκισ.
		ι2σ1μυριάκισ.
	</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
